Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-3.5] Authority to conduct
criminal history record checks without consent. When an assessment is
required pursuant to this chapter, the department may
conduct criminal history record checks, without consent, of an alleged
perpetrator of harm or threat of harm and all adult household members to ensure
the safety of the child. [L 2016, c 96, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next